Connecticut, session 2026, HB05320.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development may study and make recommendations
regarding the feasibility of establishing a Connecticut Bridge Authority
for the purpose of overseeing the funding and construction of a bridge
connecting Connecticut to Long Island. If the commissioner conducts
such study, not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall
submit a report on the results of such study to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to commerce, planning and development and transportation, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
LCO No. 2227 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5320